Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska39-865
Interstate county bridges; revenue bonds; election; when dispensed with.

No election and no vote of electors shall be required upon the question of acquiring or constructing any bridges or issuing revenue bonds as authorized by section 39-860, for the acquisition or construction of any bridge, if the governing body of the county shall determine by vote of a majority of its members to dispense with such election or vote of electors as to such question.

Laws 1935, c. 87, § 7, p. 283;

Laws 1941, c. 78, § 2, p. 317;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 39-2107;

R.S.1943, § 39-865.